src/hyphenDicts/hyph_es.dic
th3f
th3k
th3m
th3p
t3l
t3m
t3n
t3p
t3sch
tsch3b
tsch3pf
t3schr
ts3f
ts3k
t3t
tt3g
tt3n
t3ts
t3v
t3w
tz3k
tz3s2ch
uha
uhá
ú3ha
uhe
uhé
ú3he
uhi
u3hí
ú3hi
uho
uhó
ú3ho
u3hu
u3hú
ú3hu
v3ch
v3d
v3h
v3k
v3kh
v3n
v3s
vs3k
v3st
v3v
w3b
w3c
w3d
w3f
w3g
w3h
w3l
w3m
w3n
w3p
w3r
w3s
ws3k
w3t
w3w
x3b
x3bl
x3br
x3c
x3d
x3f
x3g
x3h
x3j
x3k
x3l
x3m
x3n
x3ñ
x3p
x3pl
x3pr
x3q
x3r
x3s
x3t
x3tl
x3tr
x3v
x3w
x3x
x3y
x3z
y3b
y3c
y3ch
y3h
y3l
y3m
y3n
yn3m
y3r
y3s
y3st
y3t
y3w
y3y
z3b
z3c
z3cl
z3d
z3f
z3gz3k
z3l
z3m
z3n
z3p
z3q
zs3ch
z3t
z3tl
z3z
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
2..
2,.
2;.
2:.
2”.
2›.
2».
2).
2].
2}.
2!.
2?.
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
ahy.
a2y.
9back.
2bb.
9by.
2ch.
2ch2t.
9chy.
2ck.
2cks.
9cky.
2c2n.
2c2s.
2c2t.
9cy.
2c2z.
2d2d.
2dh.
9dy.
9dyj.
2d2z.
ehy.
e2y.
2f2f.
2f2t.
9fy.
2g2g2s.
2gh.
2ght.
2ghts.
2g2n.
9gny.
9gy.
2hl.
2h2m.
2h2r.
i9hy.
i2y.
2k2s.
2k2t.
9ky.
2l2d.
2l2f.
2l2k.
2lks.
2l2m.
2l2p.
2l2ph.
2l2s2t.
2l2t.
2l2tz.
9ly.
2mb.
2m2m.
2m2n.
2m2p.
2m2p2f.
2m2s.
2m2t.
9my.
2n2c.
2n2ch.
2n2ck.
2n2d.
2n2g.
2n2k.
2n2k2s.
2n2k2t.
2n2n.
2n2s.
2n2sch.
2n2s2t.
2n2t.
2n2t2s.
9ny.
9nys.
ohy.
o2y.
2p2f.
2ph.
9phy.
2p2n.
2p2p.
2p9py.
2p2s.
2p2t.
9py.
2r2d.
2r2d2s.
2r2f.
2r2g.
2rh.
2r2k.
2r2k2s.
2r2n.
2r2n2s.
2r2p.
2r2ph.
2r2p2s.
2r2r.
9rry.
2r2s2ch.
2r2sh.
2r2s2t.
2r2th.
2r2tz.
2r2x.
9r2y.
2r2z.
2r2z2t.
2s2ch.
2s2ch2t.
2s2ch2t2s2ch.
2sh.
9sja.
2s2k.
2s2m.
2s2s.
2ß.
9ße.
2ß2t.
9s2sy.
2s2t.
9s2tein.
s2t9ly.
2s2ts.
9sy.
2s2z.
2t.
2t2ch.
2th.
9thy.
2t2l.
9tly.
9try.
2t2s.
2t2s2ch.
2t2t.
2t2x.
2t2z.
u9hy.
u2y.
2v2s.
vs9ky.
2w2h.
2w2k.
2w2n.
2zh.
2z2z.
9zzy.
% ---------------------- %
% Palabras problemáticas %
% ---------------------- %
hol1ly3wo5o7den9se
rock7and9roll
% ------------------------------------ %
% Palabras de otros idiomas (xenismos) %
% ------------------------------------ %
alz7hei9mer
bjørn9son
bwa9na
la7sa9gna
ral9ly
schwartz
